Hawaii statutes.
§501-25 Application may include several
parcels. An application may include two or more parcels of land in which
the applicant claims the same interests; provided that all parcels must be
within the same district, as such districts are defined by chapter 4, except
that the districts of North Kona and South Kona, referred to in subparagraphs
(G) and (H) of section 4-1(1), shall be deemed one district for this purpose.

Two or more parcels shall not be included in
one application regardless of where they are situated, unless the claim of the
applicant is of the same interest in each parcel included in the application.
Coapplicants, whether their claims are of equal or unequal interest in the
lands sought to be registered, shall not include more than one parcel in one
application, unless the interest claimed by each applicant is uniform and of
the same quantum of estate in every parcel sought to be included in the one
application. [L 1903, c 56, pt of §24; RL 1925, pt of §3213; am L 1927, c 258,
§4; am L 1929, c 184, §1; am L 1931, c 221, §1; RL 1935, §5016; RL 1945,
§12616; RL 1955, §342-17; HRS §501-25; am L 1972, c 91, §1(e)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next